North Carolina, session 2025, HB594.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Fayetteville for the
construction of a second entrance into the Kings Grant neighborhood, which would provide an
additional point of ingress/egress for the neighborhood.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H594-v-1*